Oklahoma, session 2025, SB474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1364.4 of Title 68, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. To utilize the sale for resale sales tax exemption, a
separate sale for resale exemption permit for each business to be
operated must be obtained from the Oklahoma Tax Commission. The
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB474 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

perm it may be obtained at no charge. The Oklahoma Tax Commission
shall grant and issue to each applicant a sale for resale permit for
each business in this state, upon proper application therefor and
verification thereof by the Oklahoma Tax Commission. A business
with multiple locations in this state may operate under one sale for
resale permit. The Oklahoma Tax Commission may additionally provide
for the access to a granted and issued permit electronically, or by
other means as established by the Oklahoma Tax Commission.
B. All vendors shall honor a valid sale for resale permit for
the sales tax exemption authorized under this section and may
utilize the verification procedures outlined in subsection E of this
section. Sales to a person providing proof of such permit shall be
exempt from the tax levied by Section 1350 et seq. of Title 68 of
the Oklahoma Statutes.
C. It shall be unlawful for any person designated as a Group
One, Group Two, Group Three or Group Four vendor, pursuant to
Section 1363 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to claim a sale
for resale exemption within this state unless a sale for resale
permit or permits have been issued to such person. Any person who
claims a sale for resale exemption pursuant to the provisions of
this section without a sale for resale permit or permits, or after a
sale for resale permit has been suspended, upon conviction, shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not more than One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB474 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. All sale for resale permits issued pursuant to this section
shall expire at 11:59 p.m. on the next June 30 following the
effective date of issuance.
E. If the Oklahoma Tax Commission develops and adopts an
electronic system for exchanging information with sellers regarding
sale for resale permit numbers of purchasers who are seeking to make
purchases for resale, sellers may use the system to verify the
validity of the sale for resale permit number. The Oklahoma Tax
Commission shall provide such sellers, free of charge, verification
of whether the sale for resale permit numbers are valid. A seller
that verifies a permit number of a purchaser, as outlined in this
subsection, shall create a presumption that the sale was a valid
sale for resale exemption.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective June 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON REVENUE AND TAXATION
February 17, 2025 - DO PASS









SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB474 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)